Florida, session 2026, HB955.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (6) of section 605.0113, Florida
Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (8), and new subsections
(6) and (7) are added to that section, to read:
605.0113 Registered agent.—
(6) Each limited liability company and each foreign
limited liability company that does not have a principal office
as defined in s. 605.0102 may designate the address of the
limited liability company's registered agent as its principal
office.
(7) A limited liability company or foreign limited
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb955-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 955 2026
liability company that lists the address of its registered agent
as its principal office under subsection (6) must provide the
department with the physical address of a named member or
manager of such limited liability company.
Section 2. Subsections (6) and (7) of section 607.0501,
Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (8) and (9),
respectively, and new subsections (6) and (7) are added to that
section, to read:
607.0501 Registered office and registered agent.—
(6) Each domestic corporation and each foreign corporation
that does not have a principal office as defined in s. 607.01401
may designate the address of the corporation's registered agent
as its principal office.
(7) A domestic or foreign corporation that lists the
address of its registered agent as its principal office under
subsection (6) must provide the department with the physical
address of a named officer or director of such corporation.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb955-00